Nebraska, session 109, LB177A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $233,030 from the General Fund
and $135,750 from the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2)
$-0- from the General Fund and $-0- from the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund
for FY2026-27 to the Nebraska State Patrol, for Program 100, to aid in carrying
out the provisions of Legislative Bill 177, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $179,591 for FY2025-26 or
$-0- for FY2026-27.
-1-